Idaho statutes. Title 15 UNIFORM PROBATE CODE
Part 9
Custody and Deposit of Wills

§ 15-2-901. [Reserved.]

After the death of the testator, any person having custody of a will of the testator shall deliver it with reasonable promptness to a person able to secure its probate and [or,] if none is known, to an appropriate court. Any person who willfully fails to deliver a will is liable to any person aggrieved for the damages which may be sustained by the failure. Any person who willfully refuses or fails to deliver a will after being ordered by the court in a proceeding brought for the purpose of compelling delivery is subject to penalty for contempt of court.

§ 15-2-902. Duty of custodian of will — Liability.